Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 36 Department of Military Affairs

36.010.
Department of Military Affairs attached to Office of Governor — Functions — Organization.

The Department of Military Affairs shall be attached to the Office of the Governor, have charge of and be responsible to the Governor for the proper functioning of the Kentucky National Guard, militia, and all other military or naval matters of the state, and shall consist of the following offices and divisions:

Office of Management and Administration, containing the:

Division of Administrative Services;

Division of Facilities;

Bluegrass Station Division; and

Logistics Operations Division;

Division of Emergency Management;

Office of the Chief of Staff for Federal Army Guard;

Office of the Chief of Staff for Federal Air Guard;

Kentucky Guard Youth Challenge Division; and

Kentucky Civil Air Patrol.

In order to promote greater efficiency, economy, and improved administration, the divisional structure of the Department of Military Affairs may be changed, redesignated, or reorganized in accordance with KRS Chapter 12. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 12, the department’s attachment to the Office of Governor as a separate organizational unit not attached to any cabinet shall not be changed except by action of the General Assembly.

History.

2711a-142, 2711a-145i, 4618-1: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 57; 1954, ch. 94, § 1; 1962, ch. 127, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 40, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 15, 1983; 1984, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 244, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 401, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 45, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 193, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 13, § 15, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Active militia, KRS Ch. 37.

Adjutant general is executive officer of active militia, KRS

37.180

.

Constitutional provisions relating to military affairs, Const., §§ 22, 75, 219 to 223.

General Assembly to provide for safekeeping of public arms, relics and banners, Const., § 223.

Governor is commander in chief of army, navy and militia, Const., § 75.

Governor to appoint adjutant general, Const., § 222.

Implementation of federal hazardous materials programs, Ch. 39E.

Local emergency management programs, Chs. 39B, 39C.

Military justice, KRS Ch. 35.

National guard, KRS Ch. 38.

Passenger motor vehicles and trucks, Department of Military Affairs may acquire, KRS

44.050

.

Statewide emergency management programs, Ch. 39A.

36.020.
Adjutant general — Appointment — Rank — Qualifications — Bond — Compensation.

The Governor, immediately on his induction into office, shall appoint the adjutant general who shall have served honorably, or be serving, as a commissioned officer of the Armed Forces of the United States, and who shall:

Have at least ten (10) years commissioned service in the Kentucky National Guard. A national guard active duty tour or mobilization of national guard units into active federal duty shall not be considered a break in national guard service.

Have attained at least the rank of lieutenant colonel with federal recognition.

Have not been separated from the Kentucky National Guard for more than five (5) years before the date of appointment.

Have met the federal recognition requirement for his current rank and be qualified to meet the requirements for federal recognition in the ranks of brigadier general and major general at the time of appointment to those ranks.

The Governor shall issue a commission to the adjutant general in the grade of major general. The commission shall automatically be vacated when the adjutant general is relieved from duty or at the expiration of the term of the Governor appointing him. The adjutant general shall execute bond in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The adjutant general shall be compensated at the base rate of pay, not including subsistence and quarters allowances, as provided in KRS

38.205

, or prescribed in KRS

64.640

.

History.

2711a-142, 2711a-151, 2711a-229, 4618-81: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 27, § 25; 1954, ch. 94, § 2; 1956, ch. 4, § 1; 1962, ch. 127, § 2; 1966, ch. 214, § 1; 1970, ch. 92, § 6; 1992, ch. 101, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bond of adjutant general, amount and conditions, KRS

62.160

,

62.180

.

Governor to appoint adjutant general, Const., § 222.

36.025.
Deputy and assistant adjutant general for Army National Guard — Assistant adjutant general and chief-of-staff for Air National Guard — Appointment, qualifications — Compensation.

For the Army National Guard, the Governor, with the recommendation of the adjutant general, may appoint a deputy adjutant general and an assistant adjutant general, who at the time of appointment shall be at least thirty (30) years of age and shall be serving as a commissioned officer in the Kentucky National Guard. The Governor shall issue a commission to each such deputy adjutant general and assistant adjutant general in the grade of brigadier general, provided such individual is qualified for federal recognition in that grade. The adjutant general, in his or her discretion, may require either the deputy or assistant adjutant general to serve as a full-time employee in the Department of Military Affairs. The deputy adjutant general or assistant adjutant general who serves as an employee of the department may be compensated at the base rate of pay, not including subsistence and quarters allowances, as provided in KRS

38.205

, or as prescribed in KRS

64.640

.

For the Air National Guard, the Governor, with the recommendation of the adjutant general, may appoint an assistant adjutant general and a chief-of-staff, who at the time of appointment shall be at least thirty (30) years of age and shall be serving as a commissioned officer in the Kentucky National Guard. The Governor shall issue a commission to each such assistant adjutant general and chief-of-staff in the grade of brigadier general, provided such individual is qualified for federal recognition in that grade. The adjutant general, in his or her discretion, may require either the assistant adjutant general or chief-of-staff to serve as a full-time employee in the Department of Military Affairs. The assistant adjutant general or chief-of-staff who serves as an employee of the department may be compensated at the base rate of pay, not including subsistence and quarters allowances, as provided in KRS

38.205

, or as prescribed in KRS

64.640

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 127, § 12; 1966, ch. 214, § 2; 1970, ch. 92, § 7; 2007, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 110, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

36.030.
Adjutant general, deputy adjutant general, chief-of-staff, and assistant adjutant general — Compatibility of office.

The office of the adjutant general, deputy adjutant general, chief-of-staff, or assistant adjutants general shall not necessarily be incompatible with or serve to vacate the commission in the Kentucky National Guard held by the officer appointed as the adjutant general, deputy adjutant general, chief-of-staff, or assistant adjutant general at the time of his or her appointment, nor shall it be incompatible with any office of the National Guard to which he or she might be promoted or appointed, nor interfere with or prevent his or her attending to the duties of the office held at the time or to which he or she may thereafter be promoted or appointed.

History.

2711a-151: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 15; 1956, ch. 4, § 2; 1962, ch. 127, § 3; 1966, ch. 214, § 3; 2021 ch. 110, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

36.040.
Duties of adjutant general — Authority to enter into agreements with federal agencies.

The adjutant general shall:

Represent the Governor in all military matters pertaining to the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Be the executive head of the Department of Military Affairs and exercise all functions vested by law in the department;

Establish the internal organizational structure of the major organizations of the department;

Organize and supervise all programs, functions, and personnel assigned to the department in accordance with all state and federal statutes and administrative regulations;

Be responsible to the Governor for the proper carrying into effect of all laws, rules, and regulations of the United States and of this state affecting the militia and other military organizations established by law;

Perform the duties prescribed for him by laws of the United States and regulations issued thereunder;

Direct and supervise the chiefs of staff departments and supervise all troops and all departments, arms, and branches of the Kentucky Army and Air National Guard;

Supervise the preparation of all returns and reports of the Department of Military Affairs;

Keep a register of all the officers of the Kentucky National Guard, and make a written report to the Governor for the annual period ending on June 30 of each year of the operations and conditions of the Department of Military Affairs;

Cause to be prepared and issued all necessary blank books, forms, and notices required to carry into full effect matters assigned to the adjutant general under the provisions of KRS Chapters 36, 37, and 38;

Direct and supervise the safekeeping and repairing of the ordnance, arms, accouterments, equipment, and all other military property belonging to the state or issued to it by the United States;

Notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet of all military property of the state which after inspection is found unsuitable for use of the cabinet;

Keep an account of:

All expenses, including pay of officers and enlisted men, allowance to officers and organizations;

Any other moneys required to be disbursed by him and through his office, including subsistence and transportation of the National Guard; and

All military property of the United States;

Issue and make requisitions for military property under the direction of the Governor, but no military property shall be issued to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the National Guard, except to such portion of the Kentucky active militia as is called out by the Governor;

Maintain as a part of his office a Bureau of War Records in which all records pertaining to wars and relics shall be kept, and be custodian of all such records, relics, colors, standards, and battle flags now the property of the state, or in its possession, or which the state may hereafter acquire;

Organize units of the National Guard at places designated by the Governor and have the members mustered into service under regulations prescribed by the Governor;

Issue all regulations, orders, and directives for the proper functioning and utilization of the Department of Military Affairs and its divisions;

Hire, discharge, and pay any personnel that the adjutant general deems necessary to fulfill defense contracts without regard to KRS Chapter 18A; and

Make contracts, acquire real and personal property by gift, purchase, or by condemnation in the manner prescribed in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, and do all things necessary to perform its duties under this section and KRS

36.080

.

The adjutant general, or his or her designee, may enter into any federal contracts, federal grants, and federal agreements with the United States of America, by and through the Department of Defense, Department of the Army, Department of the Air Force, National Guard Bureau, Federal Aviation Administration, United States Department of Homeland Security, and Federal Emergency Management Agency, and any other division, department, or agency of the federal government, as may be deemed necessary to carry out the general intent and purposes of the Department of Military Affairs.

History.

2711a-142, 2711a-152, 4618-81: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 94, § 3; 1962, ch. 127, § 4; 1970, ch. 92, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1992, ch. 313, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 244, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 540, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 39, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

36.045.
Deputy adjutants general — Appointment — Commission. [Repealed.]

36.050.
Disability of adjutant — Who to act.

In the absence or inability of the adjutant general to perform his duties, he may designate, by special order, an officer to perform his duties temporarily, and if no officer is so designated, the senior officer on duty in the adjutant general’s office shall perform the adjutant general’s duties.

History.

2711a-152.

36.060.
Kentucky disabled ex-service men’s board. [Repealed.]

36.065.
Kentucky disabled ex-service men’s board. [Repealed.]

36.067.
Logistics Operations Division.

The Logistics Operations Division shall be headed by a director appointed by the Governor in accordance with KRS

12.050

. The division shall be composed of organizational entities deemed appropriate by the adjutant general and set forth by administrative order.

The Logistics Operations Division shall provide logistical services to federal defense agencies under contract or program memorandum of agreement between those agencies and the Department of Military Affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 39, § 2, effective June 21, 2001.

36.068.
Bluegrass Station Division.

The Bluegrass Station Division exists to support, retain, and attract primarily defense and homeland security agencies, contractors, and associated and compatible operations, including the jobs which they bring to Kentucky. Agency contracts, leases, and accounting procedures may additionally reflect the needs of these customers. The Bluegrass Station Division shall be headed by a director experienced with federal contracts, construction, and installation operations, and maintenance funding requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 15, § 1, effective April 2, 2014.

36.070.
Facilities division — Director — Duties.

The facilities division shall be headed by a director experienced in the administration of real property. The division shall administer real and personal property of the Department of Military Affairs.

History.

2711a-128, 4618-84: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 127, § 5; 1976, ch. 140, § 16; 1980, ch. 188, § 14, effective July 15, 1980; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

36.080.
Armories to be provided — Acquisition — Cost.

The facilities division shall provide adequate armories, buildings and grounds for the Kentucky Army and Air National Guard for its purposes of drill, instruction and administration and for the safekeeping of public property of the state and the United States issued to or for the use of the Kentucky National Guard.

The facilities division may, either alone or in cooperation with the United States government, counties, cities, private corporations, voluntary unincorporated associations or individuals, construct, or acquire by purchase, contract, lease, gift, donations, or by condemnation in the manner prescribed in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, armories, buildings or grounds suitable for drill, instruction and administration and the safekeeping of public property, and make additions and improvements in or to such armories and facilities. The division may, either alone or with the like cooperation of others, provide heat, light, water, telephone service and other costs of operation and maintenance, including insurance.

The amounts to be spent for the construction, acquisition, maintenance and rental of armories shall be wholly within the discretion of the adjutant general.

History.

2711a-128: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 94, § 4; 1962, ch. 127, § 6; 1976, ch. 140, § 17.

36.081.
Restriction of application of KRS 36.080(3).

Subsection (3) of KRS

36.080

shall not apply to armories constructed by or rented from the Commonwealth of Kentucky Military Department Armory Corporation, organized under the laws of Kentucky, July 10, 1939.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 72, § 3; 1948, ch. 103, § 3.

36.082.
National Guard Facilities Construction Act.

This section may be cited as the National Guard Facilities Construction Act.

The purpose of this section is to provide funds for the construction of National Guard facilities at the following locations, at the estimated cost shown:

Any of these facilities may be constructed at such other locations at which National Guard units may be established.

Proceeds from the sale of facilities now held by the Department of Military Affairs which are obsolete or surplus to the needs of the department shall be deposited to the capital construction fund to the credit of the Department of Military Affairs. Such amounts credited and such additional funds as are available for general use within the capital construction fund may be used for construction of facilities for the Department of Military Affairs to carry out the provisions of this section. Any unexpended balances remaining at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse, but shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years. Upon certification by the adjutant general that any project which was planned in anticipation of receipt of federal funds, that such federal funds will not be received on a timely basis, state funds designated for such projects may revert to capital construction fund to the credit of the Department of Military Affairs for other construction projects.

Location Facility Estimated CostExpected FederalFunds StateFunds Louisville Maintenance Shop $ 75,000 $ 6,000 Hickman Armory 210,000 80,000 Lexington Armory 340,000 145,000 Lexington Maintenance Shop 75,000 6,000 Frankfort Aviation Maintenance Shop 85,000 6,800 Ravenna Armory 190,000 75,000 Russellville Armory 170,000 70,000 Frankfort Department of Military Affairs Building and State Government Emergency Operations Center 250,000 470,000 TOTAL $1,395,000 $858,800

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 71; 1958, ch. 24; 1960, ch. 177; 1966, ch. 231; 1968, ch. 58; 1974, ch. 108, § 8.

36.085.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide a local installation management fund at Department of Military Affairs facilities. The local installation management fund shall be receipts from the use of Department of Military Affairs facilities by military and nonmilitary individuals and organizations.

The General Assembly further recognizes that some Department of Military Affairs facilities are not staffed by state employees, but are staffed by members of the Kentucky National Guard, who are on the federal payroll. It is the intent of the General Assembly to authorize the adjutant general of Kentucky to appoint a member of the Kentucky National Guard as custodian of each of the various local installation management funds when an authorized state employee is not stationed at that location.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 420, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2015 ch. 72, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

36.086.
Installation management fund.

The Department of Military Affairs may establish an installation management fund account in a local bank for each Department of Military Affairs facility, notwithstanding KRS

41.070

and

45A.655

. Funds derived from the use of the buildings and grounds shall be deposited in the Department of Military Affairs local installation management fund account.

The adjutant general shall determine the maximum authorized balance in each Department of Military Affairs local installation management fund account. The adjutant general or his designated representative shall review at least annually each installation management fund account. If the account balance is excessive, the surplus funds shall be withdrawn from the installation management fund account for deposit in the appropriate Department of Military Affairs trust and agency fund account.

The local installation management fund account shall be used for expenses associated with routine Department of Military Affairs and Kentucky National Guard functions and operations. Any expense in excess of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall have approval from the facilities division director. Any expense in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall have approval from the executive director of the Department of Military Affairs. Any expense in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but not more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) shall have approval from the adjutant general or his designated representative.

The adjutant general shall provide an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet which identifies the receipts and expenditures of the installation management fund accounts. This report shall be transmitted to the Legislative Research Commission and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year. In addition, the adjutant general shall also provide information to the Legislative Research Commission and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet during the preparation of the biennial budget relating to the receipts, expenditures, and balances of these accounts.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 420, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 27, effective July 13, 1990; 2015 ch. 72, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

36.088.
Morale, welfare, and recreation facilities — Nonappropriated fund instrumentality — Administrative regulations — Use of facilities and proceeds derived therefrom.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Morale, welfare, and recreation facility” means any post exchange, canteen, barber shop, fitness center, snack bar, transient housing, billeting operation, daycare, laundry, or similar facility, the purpose of which is to enhance the morale and welfare of military personnel;

“Nonappropriated fund employee” means an employee of a nonappropriated fund instrumentality who is not an employee of the federal government or the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

“Nonappropriated fund instrumentality” means an enterprise operated exclusively with funds derived from sales or user fees, which receives no legislative appropriations for its operations.

The adjutant general is authorized to establish morale, welfare, and recreation facilities within the state as in his or her judgment may be necessary and proper for military purposes.

Morale, welfare, and recreation facilities may be established at any property under the control of the Department of Military Affairs.

As used in this subsection, “property under the control of the Department of Military Affairs” means any property on the facility installations stationing plan as maintained by the construction and facilities manager for the Kentucky National Guard, and includes all armories, training areas, ranges, and other facilities leased, licensed, or owned by the Department of Military Affairs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the adjutant general is authorized to establish a nonappropriated fund instrumentality for the purpose of operating the morale, welfare, and recreation facilities.

A nonappropriated fund instrumentality established under this section may:

Contract for goods and services;

Hire nonappropriated fund employees under terms and conditions as it may negotiate, subject only to applicable state and federal labor laws;

Establish a system of bookkeeping, accounting, and auditing procedures for the proper handling of funds derived from its operations; and

Perform any other action necessary to establish a board, corporation, or other entity for the purpose of operating the morale, welfare, and recreation facilities.

A nonappropriated fund instrumentality established under this section is solely responsible for its operations. No debt of the nonappropriated fund instrumentality is a debt of the Commonwealth. An action of the nonappropriated fund instrumentality is not an action of the Commonwealth, and shall not obligate the Commonwealth in any manner.

The adjutant general may promulgate administrative regulations for the operation of morale, welfare, and recreation facilities and any nonappropriated fund instrumentality established under this section.

All proceeds derived from the operation of the morale, welfare, and recreation facilities within the state shall, after payment of operating expenses, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, be used exclusively to benefit the morale, welfare, and recreation facilities.

Use of the morale, welfare, and recreation facilities provided for in this section is limited to:

Current and retired members of the Kentucky National Guard and their eligible dependents; and

Civilian employees of the United States or the Commonwealth of Kentucky working under Department of Military Affairs management or in support of Department of Military Affairs activities.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 30, 2015.

36.090.
Counties and cities may acquire armories — Taxes. [Repealed.]

36.100.
Rooms for veterans. [Repealed.]

36.110.
Governor’s staff.

The staff of the commander in chief shall consist of an administrative and personal staff. The administrative staff shall consist of the adjutant general and such other officers of the Kentucky National Guard, of the grade prescribed by the Department of Defense of the United States for the administrative staff for Kentucky, as are detailed by the Governor. The personal staff shall consist of not more than four (4) aides-de-camp, detailed from commissioned officers of the National Guard in active service from grades below that of colonel. Such detail shall not add to the grade of the officer so appointed. The officers detailed as aides-de-camp shall not be relieved from duty with their respective organizations but shall perform all duties pertaining thereto except when on duty as aides-de-camp under orders of the Governor. The staff shall be appointed by the Governor and shall hold office during his pleasure or during the term for which he was elected.

History.

2711a-144: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 127, § 8.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appointment of staff officers, Const., § 222.

Governor, commander in chief of militia, Const., § 75.

36.120.
Assistant adjutants general.
[Repealed.]

36.130.
Officers and personnel — Appointment — Duties — Salaries.

The adjutant general, by and with the advice and approval of the Governor, shall appoint the officers and other personnel necessary for the proper functioning of the Department of Military Affairs, fix their salaries and prescribe their duties.

History.

2711a-155: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 3.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department officers and employees, KRS

12.060

.

Officers of the militia, how chosen, Const., § 222.

36.140.
Reimbursement for expenses and subsistence for active field service or state active duty — Annual leave.

Officers and enlisted men ordered into active field service pursuant to KRS

37.240

or into state active duty as defined in KRS 38.010(4) as individuals shall be entitled to reimbursement out of the State Treasury for expense of transportation and for other expenses actually incurred pursuant to KRS

45.101

and the regulations promulgated thereunder, and, when government supplied quarters and mess facilities are not available to the officers and enlisted men without cost, they shall be entitled to reimbursement out of the State Treasury for subsistence pursuant to KRS

45.101

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent officers and employees of state, county, and local departments and agencies from receiving fifteen (15) days annual military leave with pay.

History.

2711a-156: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 94, § 7; 1962, ch. 127, § 9; 1974, ch. 108, § 9; 1982, ch. 450, § 54, effective July 1, 1983; 1992, ch. 307, § 2, effective April 9, 1992.

36.145.
Kentucky National Guard and Reserve Employers’ Council — Membership — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 158, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts
2003, ch. 158, § 1, effective June 24, 2003) was repealed by ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

36.146.
Mission of Kentucky National Guard and Reserve Employers’ Council. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 158, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts
2003, ch. 158, § 2, effective June 24, 2003) was repealed by ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

36.150.
Bonds of officers and employees. [Repealed.]

36.160.
Militia — Whom to consist of — Divided into three classes. [Repealed.]

36.170.
Codes of regulations.

The system of organization, armament, discipline and government of the National Guard shall be prescribed from time to time in a code of regulations promulgated by the Governor, subject to the laws and regulations of the United States.

The system of organization, armament, discipline and government of the Kentucky active militia shall be prescribed from time to time in a “Code of Regulations” to be promulgated by the adjutant general after being authorized by the Governor.

History.

2711a-145f, 2711a-157: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 4, §§ 10, 24; 1962, ch. 127, § 10.

36.180.
United States articles of war and regulations adopted — Imprisonment. [Repealed.]

36.190.
Council of administration — Honorary members — Jury service, exemption from. [Repealed.]

36.200.
Inspection of military property.

The adjutant general or such officers as he may designate shall inspect, at least once in each year or oftener if the Governor requires, all headquarters, arsenals, storehouses, armories, organizations, military property belonging to the state, and military property issued to the state by the United States. The inspectors shall render a detailed report to the adjutant general of the condition of same.

History.

2711a-239: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 127, § 11.

Compiler's Notes

This section is set out above to reflect a correction to the section's punctuation by the state reviser.

36.210.
Appropriations may be used interchangeably.
[Repealed.]

36.220.
Expenses of active militia — Appropriations may be used interchangeably.

All necessary cost and expense of perfecting and maintaining the organization of the Kentucky active militia, the payment of salaries, expenses of administration, purchase of necessary equipment, supplies, printing, postage and all other necessary expenditures shall be paid out of any budget appropriation made for the present or that may be made for any future fiscal year, for use of the military department, and the adjutant general is hereby authorized and empowered to use any funds so appropriated interchangeably for the Kentucky active militia or the National Guard, except as to the armory fund. In the event there is not sufficient funds in the budget allotted to the adjutant general, the Governor is authorized to expend from his emergency fund or any other fund appropriated by the Legislature a sufficient amount to take care of any deficiency that may arise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 17.

36.224.
Office for Security Coordination — Federal homeland security funding. [Repealed.]